New Jersey, session 221, S2750.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.2015, c.147 (C.2C:14-14) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  (1)  Any person alleging to be a victim of nonconsensual sexual contact, sexual penetration, or lewdness, or any attempt at such conduct, or stalking or cyber-harassment, and who is not eligible for a restraining order as a "victim of domestic violence" as defined by the provisions of subsection d. of section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19), may, except as provided in subsection b. of this section, file an application with the Superior Court pursuant to the Rules of Court alleging the commission of such conduct or attempted conduct and seeking a temporary protective order. As used in this section and in sections 3, 4, and 8 of P.L.2015, c.147 (C.2C:14-15, C.2C:14-16, and C.2C:14-20): "Sexual contact" means an intentional touching by the victim or actor, either directly or through clothing, of the victim's or actor's intimate parts for the purpose of degrading or humiliating the victim or sexually arousing or sexually gratifying the actor. "Sexual penetration" means vaginal intercourse, cunnilingus, fellatio or anal intercourse between persons or insertion of the hand, finger or object into the anus or vagina either by the actor or upon the actor's instruction. "Lewdness" means the exposing of the genitals for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual desire of the actor or of any other person. "Intimate parts" means the following body parts: sexual organs, genital area, anal area, inner thigh, groin, buttock or breast of a person. "Stalking" means purposefully or knowingly engaging in a course of conduct directed at or toward a person that would cause a reasonable person to fear for the reasonable person's own safety or the safety of a third person, or suffer other emotional distress, because the conduct involves: repeatedly maintaining a visual or physical proximity to a person; directly, indirectly, or through third parties, by any action, method, device, or means, following, monitoring, observing, surveilling, threatening, or communicating to or about a person, or interfering with a person's property; repeatedly committing harassment against a person; or repeatedly conveying, or causing to be conveyed, verbal or written threats or threats conveyed by any other means of communication or threats implied by conduct or a combination thereof directed at or towards a person. "Repeatedly" means on two or more occasions. "Emotional distress" means significant mental suffering or distress. "Cause a reasonable person to fear" means to cause fear which a reasonable victim, similarly situated, would have under the circumstances. "Cyber-harassment" means conduct that occurs, while making one or more communications in an online capacity via any electronic device or through a social networking site and with the purpose to harass another, that involves: threatening to inflict injury or physical harm to any person or the property of any person; knowingly sending, posting, commenting, requesting, suggesting, or proposing any lewd, indecent, or obscene material to or about a person with the intent to emotionally harm a reasonable person or place a reasonable person in fear of physical or emotional harm to the reasonable person; or threatening to commit any crime against a person or the person's property. (2) Except as provided in subsection b. of this section, an application for relief under P.L.2015, c.147 (C.2C:14-13 et al.) may be filed by the alleged victim's parent or guardian on behalf of the alleged victim in any case in which the alleged victim: (a) is less than 18 years of age; or (b) has a developmental disability as defined in section 3 of P.L.1977, c.200 (C.5:5-44.4) or a mental disease or defect that renders the alleged victim temporarily or permanently incapable of understanding the nature of the alleged victim's conduct, including, but not limited to, being incapable of providing consent, or of understanding the nature of the alleged conduct that is the subject of the application. b. (1) When it is alleged that nonconsensual sexual contact, sexual penetration, or lewdness, or any attempt at such conduct, or stalking or cyber-harassment has been committed by an unemancipated minor, an applicant seeking a protective order shall not proceed under the provisions of P.L.2015, c.147 (C.2C:14-13 et al.), but may seek a protective order and other relief under the "New Jersey Code of Juvenile Justice," P.L.1982, c.77 (C.2A:4A-20 et seq.) by filing a complaint pursuant to the provisions of section 11 of P.L.1982, c.77 (C.2A:4A-30). (2) When it is alleged that nonconsensual sexual contact, sexual penetration, or lewdness, or any attempt at such conduct, or stalking or cyber-harassment has been committed against an unemancipated minor by a parent, guardian, or other person having care, custody and control of that child as defined in R.S.9:6-2, an applicant seeking a protective order shall not proceed under the provisions of P.L.2015, c.147 (C.2C:14-13 et al.), but shall report the incident to the Department of Children and Families for appropriate action. c. (1) An applicant may seek a protective order pursuant to P.L.2015, c.147 (C.2C:14-13 et al.) and the court may issue such an order regardless of whether criminal charges based on the incident were filed and regardless of the disposition of any such charges. (2) The filing of an application pursuant to this section shall not prevent the filing of a criminal complaint, or the institution or maintenance of a criminal prosecution based on the same act. d.    The court shall waive any requirement that the applicant's or alleged victim's place of residence appear on the application. e.     An applicant may seek a protective order pursuant to P.L.2015, c.147 (C.2C:14-13 et al.) in a court having jurisdiction over the place where the alleged conduct or attempted conduct occurred, where the respondent resides, or where the alleged victim resides or is sheltered. f.     No fees or other costs shall be assessed against an applicant for seeking a protective order pursuant to P.L.2015, c.147 (C.2C:14-13 et al.). g.    The court shall issue a temporary protective order, pursuant to court rules, upon complaint of an applicant who is a service  member of the New Jersey National Guard or any Reserve  Component of the United States Armed Forces serving within the  State who is a victim of non-consensual sexual contact who has also  received a military protective order, or upon complaint of the Staff  Judge Advocate of the New Jersey National Guard or any Reserve Component of the United States Armed Forces serving in the State  on behalf of a named victim who is a victim of non-consensual  sexual contact who has also received a military protective order (cf: P.L.2023, c.127, s.2) 2.   Section 5 of P.L.2015, c.147 (C.2C:14-17) is amended to read as follows 5.   a. Any temporary or final protective order issued pursuant to P.L.2015, c.147 (C.2C:14-13 et al.) or military protective order issued by an appropriate military authority shall be in effect throughout the State, and shall be enforced by all law enforcement officers. b.   When a law enforcement officer finds probable cause that a respondent has committed contempt of an order entered pursuant to P.L.2015, c.147 (C.2C:14-13 et al.) or military protective order issued by an appropriate military authority, the respondent shall be arrested and taken into custody.  The court shall determine whether the respondent shall be released pending trial or detained pending a pretrial detention hearing pursuant to sections 4 and 5 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-18 and C.2A:162-19) and applicable court rules. (cf: P.L.2015, c.147, s.5) 3.   Section 6 of P.L.2015, c.147 (C.2C:14-18) is amended to read as follows: 6.    a.  A respondent's violation of any protective order issued pursuant to P.L.2015, c.147 (C.2C:14-13 et al.) or military protective order issued by an appropriate military authority shall constitute an offense under subsection d. of N.J.S.2C:29-9 and each order shall so state. All contempt proceedings brought pursuant to subsection d. of N.J.S.2C:29-9 shall be subject to any rules or guidelines established by the Supreme Court to promote the prompt disposition of criminal matters. b.    Where a victim alleges that a respondent has committed contempt of a protective order entered pursuant to the provisions of P.L.2015, c.147 (C.2C:14-13 et al.) or military protective order issued by an appropriate military authority, but a law enforcement officer has found that the facts are insufficient to establish probable cause to arrest the respondent, the law enforcement officer shall advise the victim of the procedure for completing and signing a criminal complaint alleging a violation of subsection d. of N.J.S.2C:29-9 through the municipal court. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the court from granting any other emergency relief it deems necessary. c.     If a respondent is charged with a non-indictable offense pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection d. of N.J.S.2C:29-9 as a result of a violation of a protective order entered pursuant to P.L.2015, c.147 (C.2C:14-13 et al.) or military protective order issued by an appropriate military authority, the contempt proceedings for the non-indictable offense shall be heard in the Superior Court. (cf: P.L.2016, c.93, s.2) 4.   Section 8 of P.L.2015, c.147 (C.2C:14-20) is amended as follows: 8.    The Administrative Office of the Courts shall establish and maintain a central registry of all protective orders issued pursuant to P.L.2015, c.147 (C.2C:14-13 et al.) and all protective orders issued by an appropriate military authority or a foreign tribunal of a foreign country, and all persons who have been charged with a violation of such a protective order.  All records made pursuant to this section shall be kept confidential and shall be released only to: a.     A public agency authorized to investigate a report of nonconsensual sexual contact, sexual penetration, or lewdness, or any attempt at such conduct, stalking, cyber-harassment, or domestic violence; b.    A police or other law enforcement agency for official purposes; c.     A court, upon its finding that access to such records may be necessary for determination of an issue before the court; d.    A surrogate, in that person's official capacity as deputy clerk of the Superior Court, in order to prepare documents that may be necessary for a court to determine an issue in an adoption proceeding; or e.     The Division of Child Protection and Permanency in the Department of Children and Families when the division is conducting a background investigation involving: (1) an allegation of child abuse or neglect, to include any adult member of the same household as the individual who is the subject of the abuse or neglect allegation; or (2) an out-of-home placement for a child being placed by the Division of Child Protection and Permanency, to include any adult member of the prospective placement household. Any individual, agency, or court which receives from the Administrative Office of the Courts the records referred to in this section shall keep the records and reports, or parts thereof, confidential and shall not disseminate or disclose such records and reports, or parts thereof; provided that nothing in this section shall prohibit a receiving individual, agency, surrogate or court from disclosing records and reports, or parts thereof, in a manner consistent with and in furtherance of the purpose for which the records and reports or parts thereof were received. Any individual who disseminates or discloses a record or report, or parts thereof, of the central registry, other than for an official purpose authorized by this section, for the investigation of an alleged violation of a protective order issued pursuant to P.L.2015, c.147 (C.2C:14-13 et al.), conducting a background investigation involving a person's application for employment at a police or law enforcement agency, making a determination of an issue before the court, conducting a background investigation as specified in subsection e. of this section, or for any other purpose other than that which is authorized by law, the Rules of Court or court order, shall be guilty of a crime of the fourth degree. (cf: P.L.2023, c.127, s.5) 5.    Section 12 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-28) is amended as follows: 12.  a.  A victim may file a complaint alleging the commission of an act of domestic violence with the Family Part of the Chancery Division of the Superior Court in conformity with the Rules of Court.  The court shall not dismiss any complaint or delay disposition of a case because the victim has left the residence to avoid further incidents of domestic violence.  Filing a complaint pursuant to this section shall not prevent the filing of a criminal complaint for the same act. On weekends, holidays and other times when the court is closed, a victim may file a complaint before a judge of the Family Part of the Chancery Division of the Superior Court or a municipal court judge who shall be assigned to accept complaints and issue emergency, ex parte relief in the form of temporary restraining orders pursuant to this act. A plaintiff may apply for relief under this section in a court having jurisdiction over the place where the alleged act of domestic violence occurred, where the defendant resides, or where the plaintiff resides or is sheltered, and the court shall follow the same procedures applicable to other emergency applications.  Criminal complaints filed pursuant to this act shall be investigated and prosecuted in the jurisdiction where the offense is alleged to have occurred.  Contempt complaints filed pursuant to N.J.S.2C:29-9 shall be prosecuted in the county where the contempt is alleged to have been committed and a copy of the contempt complaint shall be forwarded to the court that issued the order alleged to have been violated. b.    The court shall waive any requirement that the petitioner's place of residence appear on the complaint. c. (1) The clerk of the court, or other person designated by the court, shall assist the parties in completing any forms necessary for the filing of a summons, complaint, answer or other pleading. (2)   The plaintiff may provide information concerning firearms to which the defendant has access, including the location of these firearms, if known, on a form to be prescribed by the Administrative Director of the Courts. (3)   Information provided by the plaintiff concerning firearms to which the defendant has access shall be kept confidential and shall not be disseminated or disclosed, provided that nothing in this subsection shall prohibit dissemination or disclosure of this information in a manner consistent with and in furtherance of the purpose for which the information was provided. d.    Summons and complaint forms shall be readily available at the clerk's office, at the municipal courts and at municipal and State police stations. e.     As soon as the domestic violence complaint is filed, both the victim and the abuser shall be advised of any programs or services available for advice and counseling. f.     A plaintiff may seek emergency, ex parte relief in the nature of a temporary restraining order.  A municipal court judge or a judge of the Family Part of the Chancery Division of the Superior Court may enter an ex parte order when necessary to protect the life, health or well-being of a victim on whose behalf the relief is sought. g.    If it appears that the plaintiff is in danger of domestic violence, the judge shall, upon consideration of the plaintiff's domestic violence complaint, order emergency ex parte relief, in the nature of a temporary restraining order.  A decision shall be made by the judge regarding the emergency relief forthwith. h.    A judge may issue a temporary restraining order upon sworn testimony or complaint of an applicant who is not physically present, pursuant to court rules, or by a person who represents a person who is physically or mentally incapable of filing personally.  A temporary restraining order may be issued if the judge is satisfied that exigent circumstances exist sufficient to excuse the failure of the applicant to appear personally and that sufficient grounds for granting the application have been shown. The judge shall issue a temporary restraining order, pursuant to court rules, upon complaint of an applicant who is a service member of the New Jersey National Guard or any Reserve Component of the United States Armed Forces serving within the State who is a victim of non-consensual sexual contact who has also received a military protective order, or upon complaint of the Staff Judge Advocate of the New Jersey National Guard or any Reserve Component of the United States Armed Forces serving in the State on behalf of a named victim who is a victim of non-consensual sexual contact who has also received a military protective order. i.     An order for emergency, ex parte relief shall be granted upon good cause shown and shall remain in effect until a judge of the Family Part issues a further order.  Any temporary order hereunder is immediately appealable for a plenary hearing de novo not on the record before any judge of the Family Part of the county in which the plaintiff resides or is sheltered if that judge issued the temporary order or has access to the reasons for the issuance of the temporary order and sets forth in the record the reasons for the modification or dissolution.  The denial of a temporary restraining order by a municipal court judge and subsequent administrative dismissal of the complaint shall not bar the victim from refiling a complaint in the Family Part based on the same incident and receiving an emergency, ex parte hearing de novo not on the record before a Family Part judge, and every denial of relief by a municipal court judge shall so state. j.     Emergency relief may include forbidding the defendant from returning to the scene of the domestic violence, forbidding the defendant from possessing any firearm or other weapon enumerated in subsection r. of N.J.S.2C:39-1, ordering the search for and seizure of any firearm or other weapon at any location where the judge has reasonable cause to believe the weapon is located and the seizure of any firearms purchaser identification card or permit to purchase a handgun issued to the defendant and any other appropriate relief. If the order requires the surrender of any firearm or other weapon, a law enforcement officer shall accompany the defendant, or may proceed without the defendant if necessary, to the scene of the domestic violence or any other location where the judge has reasonable cause to believe any firearm or other weapon belonging to the defendant is located, to ensure that the defendant does not gain access to any firearm or other weapon, and that the firearm or other weapon is appropriately surrendered in accordance with the order. If the order prohibits the defendant from returning to the scene of domestic violence or any other location where the judge has reasonable cause to believe any firearm or other weapon belonging to the defendant is located, any firearm or other weapon located there shall be seized by a law enforcement officer. The order shall include notice to the defendant of the penalties for a violation of any provision of the order, including but not limited to the penalties for contempt of court and unlawful possession of a firearm or other weapon pursuant to N.J.S.2C:39-5.  Other appropriate relief may include but is not limited to an order directing the possession of any animal owned, possessed, leased, kept, or held by either party or a minor child residing in the household and providing that the animal shall not be disposed of prior to entry of a final order pursuant to section 13 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-29). The judge shall state with specificity the reasons for and scope of any search and seizure authorized by the order.  The provisions of this subsection prohibiting a defendant from possessing a firearm or other weapon shall not apply to any law enforcement officer while actually on duty, or to any member of the Armed Forces of the United States or member of the National Guard while actually on duty or traveling to or from an authorized place of duty. k.    The judge may permit the defendant to return to the scene of the domestic violence to pick up personal belongings and effects but shall, in the order granting relief, restrict the time and duration of such permission and provide for police supervision of such visit. l.     An order granting emergency relief, together with the complaint or complaints, shall immediately be forwarded to the appropriate law enforcement agency for service on the defendant, and to the police of the municipality in which the plaintiff resides or is sheltered, and shall immediately be served upon the defendant by the police, except that an order issued during regular court hours may be forwarded to the sheriff for immediate service upon the defendant in accordance with the Rules of Court.  If personal service cannot be effected upon the defendant, the court may order other appropriate substituted service.  At no time shall the plaintiff be asked or required to serve any order on the defendant. m.   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1994, c.94.) n.    Notice of temporary restraining orders issued pursuant to this section shall be sent by the clerk of the court or other person designated by the court to the appropriate chiefs of police, members of the State Police and any other appropriate law enforcement agency or court. o.    (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1994, c.94.) p.    Any temporary or final restraining order issued pursuant to this act shall be in effect throughout the State, and shall be enforced by all law enforcement officers. q.    Prior to the issuance of any temporary or final restraining order issued pursuant to this section, the court shall order that a search be made of the domestic violence central registry with regard to the defendant's record. (cf: P.L.2016, c.91, s.2) 6.    Section 1 of P.L.1978, c.95 (C.2C:33-4) is amended to read as follows: 1.    Except as provided in subsection e., a person commits a petty disorderly persons offense if, with purpose to harass another, he: a.     Makes, or causes to be made, one or more communications anonymously or at extremely inconvenient hours, or in offensively coarse language, or any other manner likely to cause annoyance or alarm; b.    Subjects another to striking, kicking, shoving, or other offensive touching, or threatens to do so; or c.     Engages in any other course of alarming conduct or of repeatedly committed acts with purpose to alarm or seriously annoy such other person. A communication under subsection a. may be deemed to have been made either at the place where it originated or at the place where it was received. d.    (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2001, c.443). e.     A person commits a crime of the fourth degree if, in committing an offense under this section, he was serving a term of imprisonment or was on parole or probation as the result of a conviction of any indictable offense under the laws of this State, any other state or the United States or he knowingly directs such action to a current or former judge that relates to the performance of the judge's public duties. f.     Engages in conduct after having been notified, in writing or otherwise, while the person was a member of the National Guard, not to engage in such conduct by a commanding officer. A person violates this paragraph regardless of whether the person is a member of the National Guard when the person engages in the conduct and regardless of where the conduct occurs. The notification not to engage in such conduct expires one year from the date of issuance. (cf: P.L.2021, c.327, s.1) 7.    N.J.S.2C:58-3 is amended to read as follows: 2C:58-3. a. Permit to purchase a handgun. (1)  A person shall not sell, give, transfer, assign or otherwise dispose of, nor receive, purchase, or otherwise acquire a handgun unless the purchaser, assignee, donee, receiver or holder is licensed as a dealer under this chapter or has first secured a permit to purchase a handgun as provided by this section. (2) A person who is not a licensed retail dealer and sells, gives, transfers, assigns, or otherwise disposes of, or receives, purchases or otherwise acquires a handgun pursuant to this section shall conduct the transaction through a licensed retail dealer. The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply if the transaction is: (a) between members of an immediate family as defined in subsection n. of this section; (b) between law enforcement officers; (c) between collectors of firearms or ammunition as curios or relics as defined in Title 18, U.S.C. section 921(a)(13) who have in their possession a valid Collector of Curios and Relics License issued by the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms, and Explosives; or (d) a temporary transfer pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1992, c.74 (C.2C:58-3.1) or section 1 of P.L.1997, c.375 (C.2C:58-3.2). (3) Prior to a transaction conducted pursuant to this subsection, the retail dealer shall complete a National Instant Criminal Background Check of the person acquiring the handgun.  In addition: (a) the retail dealer shall submit to the Superintendent of State Police, on a form approved by the superintendent, information identifying and confirming the background check; (b) every retail dealer shall maintain a record of transactions conducted pursuant to this subsection, which shall be maintained at the address displayed on the retail dealer's license for inspection by a law enforcement officer during reasonable hours; (c) a retail dealer may charge a fee for a transaction conducted pursuant to this subsection; and (d) any record produced pursuant to this subsection shall not be considered a public record pursuant to P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.) or P.L.2001, c.404 (C.47:1A-5 et al.). b.   Firearms purchaser identification card. (1) A person shall not sell, give, transfer, assign or otherwise dispose of nor receive, purchase or otherwise acquire an antique cannon or a rifle or shotgun, other than an antique rifle or shotgun, unless the purchaser, assignee, donee, receiver or holder is licensed as a dealer under this chapter or possesses a valid firearms purchaser identification card, and first exhibits the card to the seller, donor, transferor or assignor, and unless the purchaser, assignee, donee, receiver or holder signs a written certification, on a form prescribed by the superintendent, which shall indicate that the person presently complies with the requirements of subsection c. of this section and shall contain the person's name, address and firearms purchaser identification card number or dealer's registration number.  The certification shall be retained by the seller, as provided in paragraph (4) of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:58-2, or, in the case of a person who is not a dealer, it may be filed with the chief police officer of the municipality in which the person resides or with the superintendent. (2) A person who is not a licensed retail dealer and sells, gives, transfers, assigns, or otherwise disposes of, or receives, purchases or otherwise acquires an antique cannon or a rifle or shotgun pursuant to this section shall conduct the transaction through a licensed retail dealer. The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply if the transaction is: (a) between members of an immediate family as defined in subsection n. of this section; (b) between law enforcement officers; (c) between collectors of firearms or ammunition as curios or relics as defined in Title 18, U.S.C. section 921(a)(13) who have in their possession a valid Collector of Curios and Relics License issued by the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms, and Explosives; or (d) a temporary transfer pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1992, c.74 (C.2C:58-3.1) and section 1 of P.L.1997, c.375 (C.2C:58-3.2). (3) Prior to a transaction conducted pursuant to this subsection, the retail dealer shall complete a National Instant Criminal Background Check of the person acquiring an antique cannon or a rifle or shotgun.  In addition: (a) the retail dealer shall submit to the Superintendent of State Police, on a form approved by the superintendent, information identifying and confirming the background check; (b) every retail dealer shall maintain a record of transactions conducted pursuant to this section which shall be maintained at the address set forth on the retail dealer's license for inspection by a law enforcement officer during reasonable hours; (c) a retail dealer may charge a fee, not to exceed $70, for a transaction conducted pursuant to this subsection; and (d) any record produced pursuant to this subsection shall not be considered a public record pursuant to P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.) or P.L.2001, c.404 (C.47:1A-5 et al.). c.   Who may obtain.  Except as hereinafter provided, a person shall not be denied a permit to purchase a handgun or a firearms purchaser identification card, unless the person is known in the community in which the person lives as someone who has engaged in acts or made statements suggesting the person is likely to engage in conduct, other than justified self-defense, that would pose a danger to self or others, or is subject to any of the disabilities set forth in this section or other sections of this chapter.  A handgun purchase permit or firearms purchaser identification card shall not be issued: (1) To any person who has been convicted of: (a) any crime in this State or its felony counterpart in any other state or federal jurisdiction; or (b) a disorderly persons offense in this State involving an act of domestic violence as defined in section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19) or its felony or misdemeanor counterpart involving an act of domestic violence as defined under a comparable statute in any other state or federal jurisdiction, whether or not armed with or possessing a weapon at the time of the offense; (2) To any person who is presently confined for a mental disorder as a voluntary admission as defined in section 2 of P.L.1987, c.116 (C.30:4-27.2) or who is presently involuntarily committed to inpatient or outpatient treatment pursuant to P.L.1987, c.116 (C.30:4-27.1 et seq.); (3) To any person who suffers from a physical defect or disease which would make it unsafe for that person to handle firearms, to any person with a substance use disorder involving drugs as defined in section 2 of P.L.1970, c.226 (C.24:21-2), or to any alcoholic as defined in section 2 of P.L.1975, c.305 (C.26:2B-8) unless any of the foregoing persons produces a certificate of a medical doctor, treatment provider, or psychiatrist licensed in New Jersey, or other satisfactory proof, that the person is no longer suffering from that particular disability in a manner that would interfere with or handicap that person in the handling of firearms; to any person who knowingly falsifies any information on the application form for a handgun purchase permit or firearms purchaser identification card; (4) To any person under the age of 18 years for a firearms purchaser identification card and to any person under the age of 21 years for a permit to purchase a handgun; (5) To any person where the issuance would not be in the interest of the public health, safety or welfare because the person is found to be lacking the essential character of temperament necessary to be entrusted with a firearm; (6) To any person who is subject to or has violated a temporary or final restraining order issued pursuant to the "Prevention of Domestic Violence Act of 1991", P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-17 et seq.) prohibiting the person from possessing any firearm [or] , a temporary or final domestic violence restraining order issued in another jurisdiction prohibiting the person from possessing any firearm , or a  substantially similar order issued by the court of another state, tribe, United States territory, appropriate military authority, or military  tribunal; (7) To any person who as a juvenile was adjudicated delinquent for an offense which, if committed by an adult, would constitute a crime and the offense involved the unlawful use or possession of a weapon, explosive or destructive device or is enumerated in subsection d. of section 2 of P.L.1997, c.117 (C.2C:43-7.2); (8) To any person whose firearm is seized pursuant to the "Prevention of Domestic Violence Act of 1991", P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-17 et seq.) and whose firearm has not been returned; or (9) To any person named on the consolidated Terrorist Watchlist maintained by the Terrorist Screening Center administered by the Federal Bureau of Investigation; (10) To any person who is subject to or has violated a court order prohibiting the custody, control, ownership, purchase, possession, or receipt of a firearm or ammunition issued pursuant to the "Extreme Risk Protective Order Act of 2018", P.L.2018, c.35 (C.2C:58-20 et al.); (11) To any person who is subject to or has violated a court order prohibiting the custody, control, ownership, purchase, possession, or receipt of a firearm or ammunition issued pursuant to P.L.2021, c.327 (C.2C:12-14 et al.); (12) To any person who is subject to or has violated a temporary or final protective order issued pursuant to the "Victim's Assistance and Survivor Protection Act," P.L.2015, c.147 (C.2C:14-13 et al.); (13) To any person who has previously been voluntarily admitted to inpatient treatment pursuant to P.L.1987, c.116 (C.30:4-27.1 et seq.) or involuntarily committed to inpatient or outpatient treatment pursuant to P.L.1987, c.116 (C.30:4-27.1 et seq.), unless the court has expunged the person's record pursuant to P.L.1953, c.268 (C.30:4-80.8 et seq.); (14) To any person who is subject to an outstanding arrest warrant for an indictable crime in this State or for a felony, other than a felony to which section 1 of P.L.2022, c.50 (C.2A:160-14.1) would apply, in any other state or federal jurisdiction; or (15) To any person who is a fugitive from justice due to having fled from any state or federal jurisdiction to avoid prosecution for a crime, other than a crime to which section 1 of P.L.2022, c.50 (C.2A:160-14.1) would apply, or to avoid giving testimony in any criminal proceeding. In order to obtain a permit to purchase a handgun or a firearms purchaser identification card, the applicant shall demonstrate that, within four years prior to the date of the application, the applicant satisfactorily completed a course of instruction approved by the superintendent in the lawful and safe handling and storage of firearms.  The applicant shall be required to demonstrate completion of a course of instruction only once prior to obtaining either a firearms purchaser identification card or the applicant's first permit to purchase a handgun. The applicant shall not be required to demonstrate completion of a course of instruction in order to obtain any subsequent permit to purchase a handgun, to replace an existing firearms purchaser identification card, or to renew a firearms purchaser identification card. An applicant who is a law enforcement officer who has satisfied the requirements of subsection j. of N.J.S.2C:39-6, a retired law enforcement officer who has satisfied the requirements of subsection l. of N.J.S.2C:39-6, or a veteran who was honorably discharged as a member of the United States Armed Forces or National Guard who received substantially equivalent training shall not be required to complete the course of instruction required pursuant to the provisions of this subsection. A person who obtained a permit to purchase a handgun or a firearms purchaser identification card prior to the effective date of P.L.2022, c.58 shall not be required to complete a course of instruction pursuant to this subsection. d.   Issuance. The chief police officer of an organized full-time police department of the municipality where the applicant resides or the superintendent, in all other cases, shall upon application, issue to any person qualified under the provisions of subsection c. of this section a permit to purchase a handgun or a firearms purchaser identification card. A firearms purchaser identification card issued following the effective date of P.L.2022, c.58 shall display a color photograph and be electronically linked to the fingerprints of the card holder.  A person who obtained a firearms purchaser identification card prior to the effective date of P.L.2022, c.58 shall not be required to obtain a firearms purchaser identification card that displays a color photograph and is electronically linked to fingerprints.  The superintendent shall establish guidelines as necessary to effectuate the issuance of firearms purchaser identification cards that display a color photograph and which are electronically linked to the fingerprints of the card holder. The requirements of this subsection concerning firearms purchaser identification cards issued following the effective date of P.L.2022, c.58 shall remain inoperative until such time as the superintendent establishes a system to produce cards that comply with this requirement and, until such time, applicants issued a firearms purchaser identification card shall be provided with cards that do not conform to the requirements of this section, which shall be afforded full force and effect until such time as the system is established and a compliant card is issued in accordance with this subsection.  An applicant issued a non-compliant firearms purchaser identification card shall obtain a card, at no cost to the applicant, which conforms to the requirements of this section no later than one year after receiving notice that the system to produce cards that comply with this requirement is operational. If an application for a permit or identification card is denied, the applicant shall be provided with a written statement of the reasons for the denial.  Any person aggrieved by the denial of a permit or identification card may request a hearing in the Superior Court of the county in which the person resides if the person is a resident of New Jersey or in the Superior Court of the county in which the person's application was filed if the person is a nonresident.  The request for a hearing shall be made in writing within 30 days of the denial of the application for a permit or identification card.  The applicant shall serve a copy of the request for a hearing upon the chief police officer of the municipality in which the person resides, if the person is a resident of New Jersey, and upon the superintendent in all cases.  The hearing shall be held and a record made thereof within 60 days of the receipt of the application for a hearing by the judge of the Superior Court.  No formal pleading and no filing fee shall be required as a preliminary to a hearing.  Appeals from the results of a hearing shall be in accordance with law. The Administrative Director of the Courts shall coordinate with the superintendent in the development of an electronic filing system to receive requests for hearings and serve the chief police officer and superintendent as required in this section. e.   Applications. Applications for permits to purchase a handgun and for firearms purchaser identification cards shall be in the form prescribed by the superintendent and shall set forth the name, residence, place of business, age, date of birth, occupation, sex, any aliases or other names previously used by the applicant, gender, and physical description, including distinguishing physical characteristics, if any, of the applicant, and shall state whether the applicant is a citizen, whether the applicant is an alcoholic as defined in section 2 of P.L.1975, c.305 (C. 26:2B-8) or is a drug-dependent person as defined in section 2 of P.L.1970, c.226 (C.24:21-2), whether the applicant has ever been confined or committed to a mental institution or hospital for treatment or observation of a mental or psychiatric condition on a temporary, interim or permanent basis, giving the name and location of the institution or hospital and the dates of confinement or commitment, whether the applicant has been attended, treated or observed by any doctor or psychiatrist or at any hospital or mental institution on an inpatient or outpatient basis for any mental or psychiatric condition, giving the name and location of the doctor, psychiatrist, hospital or institution and the dates of the occurrence, whether the applicant presently or ever has been a member of any organization which advocates or approves the commission of acts of force and violence to overthrow the Government of the United States or of this State, or which seeks to deny others their rights under the Constitution of either the United States or the State of New Jersey, whether the applicant has ever been convicted of a crime or disorderly persons offense in this State or felony or misdemeanor in any other state or federal jurisdiction, whether the applicant is subject to a restraining order issued pursuant to the "Prevention of Domestic Violence Act of 1991", P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-17 et seq.) or an order entered under the provisions of a substantially similar statute under the laws of another jurisdiction prohibiting the applicant from possessing any firearm, whether the applicant is subject to a protective order issued pursuant to the "Victim's Assistance and Survivor Protection Act," P.L.2015, c.147 (C.2C:14-13 et al.) or an order entered under the provisions of a substantially similar statute under the laws of another jurisdiction, whether the applicant is subject to a protective order issued pursuant to the "Extreme Risk Protective Order Act of 2018", P.L.2018, c.35 (C.2C:58-20 et al.), whether the applicant is subject to a protective order issued pursuant to P.L.2021, c.327 (C.2C:12-14 et al.) prohibiting the applicant from possessing any firearm, and other information as the superintendent shall deem necessary for the proper enforcement of this chapter.  For the purpose of complying with this subsection, the applicant shall waive any statutory or other right of confidentiality relating to institutional confinement.  The application shall be signed by the applicant and shall contain as references the names and addresses of two reputable citizens personally acquainted with the applicant. An applicant for a permit to purchase a handgun shall also certify, with respect to each handgun listed on the form, whether the applicant is purchasing the handgun on the applicant's own behalf or, if not, that the purchase is being made on behalf of a third party to whom the applicant may lawfully transfer the handgun. Application blanks shall be obtainable from the superintendent, from any other officer authorized to grant a permit or identification card, and from licensed retail dealers, or shall be made available through an online process established or made available by the superintendent. The chief police officer or the superintendent shall obtain the fingerprints of the applicant and shall have them compared with any and all records of fingerprints in the municipality and county in which the applicant resides and also the records of the State Bureau of Identification and the Federal Bureau of Investigation, provided that an applicant for a handgun purchase permit who possesses a valid firearms purchaser identification card, or who has previously obtained a handgun purchase permit from the same licensing authority for which the applicant was previously fingerprinted, and who provides other reasonably satisfactory proof of the applicant's identity, need not be fingerprinted again; however, the chief police officer or the superintendent shall proceed to investigate the application to determine whether or not the applicant has become subject to any of the disabilities set forth in this chapter. f.    Granting of permit or identification card; fee; term; renewal; revocation.  The application for the permit to purchase a handgun together with a fee of $25, or the application for the firearms purchaser identification card together with a fee of $50, shall be delivered or forwarded to the licensing authority who, upon determining that the application is complete, shall investigate the same and, provided the requirements of this section are met, shall grant the permit or the identification card, or both, if application has been made therefor, within 30 days from the date of receipt of the completed application for residents of this State and within 45 days for nonresident applicants.  A permit to purchase a handgun shall be valid for a period of 90 days from the date of issuance and may be renewed by the issuing authority for good cause for an additional 90 days.  A firearms purchaser identification card issued or renewed after the effective date of P.L.2022, c.58 shall expire during the tenth calendar year following its date of issuance and on the same calendar day as the person's date of birth. If the date of birth of the firearms purchaser identification card holder does not correspond to a calendar day of the tenth calendar year, the card shall expire on the last day of the birth month of the card holder. A firearms purchaser identification card issued pursuant to this section may be renewed upon filing of a renewal application and payment of the required fee, provided that the holder is not subject to any of the disabilities set forth in subsection c. of this section and complies with all other applicable requirements as set forth in statute and regulation.  If an application for renewal of a firearms purchaser identification card is denied, the applicant shall be provided with a written statement of the reasons for the denial.  Any person aggrieved by the denial of an application for renewal of a firearms purchaser identification card may request a hearing in the Superior Court of the county in which the person resides if the person is a resident of New Jersey or in the Superior Court of the county in which the person's application was filed if the person is a nonresident.  The request for a hearing shall be made in writing within 30 days of the denial of the application for renewal of the firearms purchaser identification card.  The applicant shall serve a copy of the request for a hearing upon the chief police officer of the municipality in which the applicant resides, if the person is a resident of New Jersey, and upon the superintendent in all cases.  The hearing shall be held and a record made thereof within 60 days of the receipt of the application for a hearing by the judge of the Superior Court.  A formal pleading and filing fee shall not be required as a preliminary to a hearing.  Appeals from the results of a hearing shall be in accordance with law. The Administrative Director of the Courts shall coordinate with the superintendent in the development of an electronic filing system to receive requests for hearings and serve the chief police officer and superintendent as required in this section. A firearms purchaser identification card issued prior to the effective date of P.L.2022, c.58 shall not expire. A firearms purchaser identification card shall be void if the holder becomes subject to any of the disabilities set forth in subsection c. of this section, whereupon the card shall be returned within five days by the holder to the superintendent, who shall then advise the licensing authority.  Failure of the holder to return the firearms purchaser identification card to the superintendent within the five days shall be an offense under subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:39-10.  Any firearms purchaser identification card may be revoked by the Superior Court of the county wherein the card was issued, after hearing upon notice, upon a finding that the holder thereof no longer qualifies for the issuance of the permit.  The county prosecutor of any county, the chief police officer of any municipality or any citizen may apply to the court at any time for the revocation of the card. There shall be no conditions or requirements added to the form or content of the application, or required by the licensing authority for the issuance or renewal of a permit or identification card, other than those that are specifically set forth in this chapter. g.   Disposition of fees.  All fees for permits shall be paid to the State Treasury for deposit into the Victims of Crime Compensation Office account if the permit is issued by the superintendent, to the municipality if issued by the chief police officer, and to the county treasurer if issued by the judge of the Superior Court. h.   Form of permit; establishment of a web portal; disposition of the completed information.  (1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the permit shall be in the form prescribed by the superintendent and shall be issued to the applicant electronically through e-mail or the web portal established or designated for this purpose by the superintendent or in such form or manner as may be authorized by the superintendent.  Prior to the time the applicant receives the handgun from the seller, the applicant shall provide to the seller an acknowledgement of the permit in the form required under the process established by the superintendent, and the seller shall complete all of the information required on the web portal.  This information shall be forwarded to the superintendent through the web portal, or in such other manner as may be authorized by the superintendent, and to the chief police officer of the municipality in which the purchaser resides, except that in a municipality having no chief police officer, the information shall be forwarded to the superintendent.  The purchaser shall retain a copy of the completed information and the seller shall retain a copy of the completed information as a permanent record. A transfer of a handgun between or among immediate family members, law enforcement officers, or collectors of firearms or ammunition as curios or relics shall be conducted via the web portal established or designated by the superintendent, which shall include among other things a certification that the seller and purchaser are in fact immediate family members, law enforcement officers, or collectors of firearms or ammunition as curios or relics. (2) The requirements of this subsection concerning the delivery and form of permit and disposition of copies shall not be applicable when these functions may be completed by utilizing an electronic system as described in paragraph (2) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:58-2 or section 5 of P.L.2022, c.55 (C.2C:58-3.3a). i.    Restriction on number of firearms person may purchase.  Only one handgun shall be purchased or delivered on each permit and no more than one handgun shall be purchased within any 30-day period, but this limitation shall not apply to: (1) a federal, State, or local law enforcement officer or agency purchasing handguns for use by officers in the actual performance of their law enforcement duties; (2) a collector of handguns as curios or relics as defined in Title 18, United States Code, section 921(a)(13) who has in the collector's possession a valid Collector of Curios and Relics License issued by the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives; (3) transfers of handguns among licensed retail dealers, registered wholesale dealers and registered manufacturers; (4) transfers of handguns from any person to a licensed retail dealer or a registered wholesale dealer or registered manufacturer; (5) any transaction where the person has purchased a handgun from a licensed retail dealer and has returned that handgun to the dealer in exchange for another handgun within 30 days of the original transaction, provided the retail dealer reports the exchange transaction to the superintendent; or (6) any transaction where the superintendent issues an exemption from the prohibition in this subsection pursuant to the provisions of section 4 of P.L.2009, c.186 (C.2C:58-3.4). The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to afford or authorize any other exemption from the regulatory provisions governing firearms set forth in chapter 39 and chapter 58 of Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes; A person shall not be restricted as to the number of rifles or shotguns the person may purchase, provided the person possesses a valid firearms purchaser identification card and provided further that the person signs the certification required in subsection b. of this section for each transaction. j.    Firearms passing to heirs or legatees.  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section concerning the transfer, receipt or acquisition of a firearm, a permit to purchase or a firearms purchaser identification card shall not be required for the passing of a firearm upon the death of an owner thereof to the owner's heir or legatee, whether the same be by testamentary bequest or by the laws of intestacy.  The person who shall so receive, or acquire the firearm shall, however, be subject to all other provisions of this chapter.  If the heir or legatee of the firearm does not qualify to possess or carry it, the heir or legatee may retain ownership of the firearm for the purpose of sale for a period not exceeding 180 days, or for a further limited period as may be approved by the chief law enforcement officer of the municipality in which the heir or legatee resides or the superintendent, provided that the firearm is in the custody of the chief law enforcement officer of the municipality or the superintendent during that period. k.   Sawed-off shotguns.  Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the purchase or possession of any sawed-off shotgun. l.    Nothing in this section and in N.J.S.2C:58-2 shall apply to the sale or purchase of a visual distress signaling device approved by the United States Coast Guard, solely for possession on a private or commercial aircraft or any boat; provided, however, that no person under the age of 18 years shall purchase nor shall any person sell to a person under the age of 18 years a visual distress signaling device. m.  The provisions of subsections a. and b. of this section and paragraphs (4) and (5) of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:58-2 shall not apply to the purchase of firearms by a law enforcement agency for use by law enforcement officers in the actual performance of the officers' official duties, which purchase may be made directly from a manufacturer or from a licensed dealer located in this State or any other state. n.   For the purposes of this section, "immediate family" means a spouse, domestic partner as defined in section 3 of P.L.2003, c.246 (C.26:8A-3), partner in a civil union couple as defined in section 2 of P.L.2006, c.103 (C.37:1-29), parent, stepparent, grandparent, sibling, stepsibling, child, stepchild, and grandchild, as related by blood or by law. o.   Registration of handguns owned by new residents.  Any person who becomes a resident of this State following the effective date of P.L.2022, c.52 and who transports into this State a firearm that the person owned or acquired while residing in another state shall apply for a firearms purchaser identification card within 60 days of becoming a New Jersey resident, and shall register any handgun so transported into this State within 60 days as provided in this subsection. A person who registers a handgun pursuant to this subsection shall complete a registration statement, which shall be in a form prescribed by the superintendent.  The information provided in the registration statement shall include, but shall not be limited to, the name and address of the person and the make, model, and serial number of the handgun being registered.  Each registration statement shall be signed by the person, and the signature shall constitute a representation of the accuracy of the information contained in the registration statement. The registration statement shall be submitted to the law enforcement agency of the municipality in which the person resides or, if the municipality does not have a municipal law enforcement agency, any State Police station. Within 60 days prior to the effective date of P.L.2022, c.52, the superintendent shall prepare the form of registration statement as described in this subsection and shall provide a suitable supply of statements to each organized full-time municipal police department and each State Police station. A person who fails to apply for a firearms purchaser identification card or register a handgun as required pursuant to this subsection shall be granted 30 days to comply with the provisions of this subsection.  If the person does not comply within 30 days, the person shall be liable to a civil penalty of $250 for a first offense and shall be guilty of a disorderly persons offense for a second or subsequent offense. If a person is in possession of multiple firearms or handguns in violation of this subsection, the person shall be guilty of one offense under this subsection provided the violation is a single event. The civil penalty shall be collected pursuant to the "Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999," P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.) in a summary proceeding before the municipal court having jurisdiction.  A law enforcement officer having enforcement authority in that municipality may issue a summons for a violation, and may serve and execute all process with respect to the enforcement of this subsection consistent with the Rules of Court. p.   A chief police officer or the superintendent may delegate to subordinate officers or employees of the law enforcement agency the responsibilities established pursuant to this section. (cf: P.L.2023, c.127, s.6) 8.   Section 3 of P.L.2013, c.82 (C.34:11C-3) is amended to read as follows: 3.  a.  Any employee of an employer in the State who was a victim of an incident of domestic violence as defined in section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19) or a sexually violent offense as defined in section 3 of P.L.1998, c.71 (C.30:4-27.26), or whose parent-in-law, sibling, grandparent, grandchild, child, parent, spouse, domestic partner, or civil union partner individual, or any other individual related by blood to the employee, and any other individual that the employee shows to have a close association with the employee which is the equivalent of a family relationship, was a victim shall be entitled to unpaid leave of no more than 20 days in one 12-month period, to be used in the 12-month period next following any incident of domestic violence or any sexually violent offense as provided in this section.  For purposes of this section, each incident of domestic violence or any sexually violent offense shall constitute a separate offense for which an employee is entitled to unpaid leave, provided that the employee has not exhausted the allotted 20 days for the 12-month period.  The unpaid leave may be taken intermittently in intervals of no less than one day, as needed for the purpose of engaging in any of the following activities as they relate to the incident of domestic violence or sexually violent offense: (1)   seeking medical attention for, or recovering from, physical or psychological injuries caused by domestic or sexual violence to the employee or the employee's parent-in-law, sibling, grandparent, grandchild, child, parent, spouse, domestic partner, or civil union partner individual, or any other individual related by blood to the employee, and any other individual that the employee shows to have a close association with the employee which is the equivalent of a family relationship; (2)   obtaining services from a victim services organization for the employee or the employee's parent-in-law, sibling, grandparent, grandchild, child, parent, spouse, domestic partner, or civil union partner individual, or any other individual related by blood to the employee, and any other individual that the employee shows to have a close association with the employee which is the equivalent; (3)   obtaining psychological or other counseling for the employee or the employee's parent-in-law, sibling, grandparent, grandchild, child, parent, spouse, domestic partner, or civil union partner individual, or any other individual related by blood to the employee, and any other individual that the employee shows to have a close association with the employee which is the equivalent of a family relationship; (4)   participating in safety planning, temporarily or permanently relocating, or taking other actions to increase the safety of the employee or the employee's parent-in-law, sibling, grandparent, grandchild, child, parent, spouse, domestic partner, or civil union partner individual, or any other individual related by blood to the employee, and any other individual that the employee shows to have a close association with the employee which is the equivalent of a family relationship, from future domestic or sexual violence or to ensure economic security; (5)   seeking legal assistance or remedies to ensure the health and safety of the employee or the employee's parent-in-law, sibling, grandparent, grandchild, child, parent, spouse, domestic partner, or civil union partner, individual, or any other individual related by blood to the employee, and any other individual that the employee shows to have a close association with the employee which is the equivalent of a family relationship, including preparing for, or participating in, any civil [or] , criminal, or military legal proceeding related to or derived from domestic or sexual violence; or (6)   attending, participating in, or preparing for a criminal [or] , civil court, or military proceeding relating to an incident of domestic or sexual violence of which the employee or the employee's parent-in-law, sibling, grandparent, grandchild, child, parent, spouse, domestic partner, or civil union partner, or any other individual related by blood to the employee, and any other individual that the employee shows to have a close association with the employee which is the equivalent of a family relationship, was a victim. An eligible employee may elect to use any of the accrued paid vacation leave, personal leave, or medical or sick leave of the employee, or any family temporary disability leave benefits provided pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-27), during any part of the 20-day period of unpaid leave provided under this subsection.  In such case, any paid leave provided by the employer, and accrued pursuant to established policies of the employer, or family temporary disability leave benefits, shall run concurrently with the unpaid leave provided under this subsection and, accordingly, the employee shall receive pay pursuant to the employer's applicable paid leave policy, or family temporary disability leave benefits, during the period of otherwise unpaid leave.  If an employee requests leave for a reason covered by both this subsection and the "Family Leave Act," P.L.1989, c.261 (C.34:11B-1 et seq.) or the federal "Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993," Pub.L.103-3 (29 U.S.C. s.2601 et seq.), the leave shall count simultaneously against the employee's entitlement under each respective law. Leave granted under this section shall not conflict with any rights pursuant to the "Family Leave Act," P.L.1989, c.261 (C.34:11B-1 et seq.), the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-25 et al.), or the federal "Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993," Pub.L.103-3 (29 U.S.C. s.2601 et seq.). b.    Prior to taking the leave provided for in this section, an employee shall, if the necessity for the leave is foreseeable, provide the employer with written notice of the need for the leave, unless an emergency or other unforeseen circumstances precludes prior notice. The notice shall be provided to the employer as far in advance as is reasonable and practical under the circumstances. c.     Nothing contained in this act shall be construed to prohibit an employer from requiring that a period of leave provided pursuant to this section be supported by the employee with documentation of the domestic violence or sexually violent offense which is the basis for the leave. If the employer requires the documentation, the employee shall be regarded as having provided sufficient documentation if the employee provides one or more of the following: (1)   a domestic violence restraining order or other documentation of equitable relief issued by a court of competent jurisdiction or military protective order issued by an appropriate military authority; (2)   a letter or other written documentation from the county or municipal prosecutor documenting the domestic violence or sexually violent offense; (3)   documentation of the conviction of a person for the domestic violence or sexually violent offense; (4)   medical documentation of the domestic violence or sexually violent offense; (5)   certification from a certified Domestic Violence Specialist or the director of a designated domestic violence agency or Rape Crisis Center, that the employee or employee's parent-in-law, sibling, grandparent, grandchild, child, parent, spouse, domestic partner, or civil union partner, or any other individual related by blood to the employee, and any other individual that the employee shows to have a close association with the employee which is the equivalent of a family relationship, is a victim of domestic violence or a sexually violent offense; or (6)   other documentation or certification of the domestic violence or sexually violent offense provided by a social worker, member of the clergy, shelter worker, military family advocacy program, or other professional who has assisted the employee or employee's parent-in-law, sibling, grandparent, grandchild, child, parent, spouse, domestic partner, or civil union partner, or any other individual related by blood to the employee, and any other individual that the employee shows to have a close association with the employee which is the equivalent of a family relationship, in dealing with the domestic violence or sexually violent offenses. For the purposes of this subsection: "Certified Domestic Violence Specialist" means a person who has fulfilled the requirements of certification as a Domestic Violence Specialist established by the New Jersey Association of Domestic Violence Professionals; and "designated domestic violence agency" means a county-wide organization with a primary purpose to provide services to victims of domestic violence, and which provides services that conform to the core domestic violence services profile as defined by the Division of Child Protection and Permanency in the Department of Children and Families and is under contract with the division for the express purpose of providing the services. "Rape Crisis Center" means an office, institution, or center offering assistance to victims of sexual offenses through crisis intervention, medical and legal information, and follow-up counseling. d.    An employer shall display conspicuous notice of its employees' rights and obligations pursuant to the provisions of this act, in such form and in such manner as the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development shall prescribe, and use other appropriate means to keep its employees so informed. e.     No provision of this act shall be construed as requiring or permitting an employer to reduce employment benefits provided by the employer or required by a collective bargaining agreement which are in excess of those required by this act. Nor shall any provision of this act be construed to prohibit the negotiation and provision through collective bargaining agreements of leave policies or benefit programs which provide benefits in excess of those required by this act. This provision shall apply irrespective of the date that a collective bargaining agreement takes effect. Nothing contained in this act shall be construed as permitting an employer to: (1)   rescind or reduce any employment benefit accrued prior to the date on which the leave taken pursuant to this act commenced; or (2)   rescind or reduce any employment benefit, unless the rescission or reduction of the benefit is based on changes that would have occurred if an employee continued to work without taking the leave provided pursuant to this section. f.     All information provided to an employer pursuant to subsection c. of this section, and any information regarding a leave taken pursuant to this section and any failure of an employee to return to work, shall be retained in the strictest confidentiality, unless the disclosure is voluntarily authorized in writing by the employee or is required by a federal or State law, rule, or regulation. (cf: P.L.2019, c.37, s.4) 9.    Section 2 of P.L.1993, c.281 (C.38A:3-2b3) is amended to read as follows 2.    The Adjutant General of the Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs shall: a.     develop economic criteria for determining eligibility for financial assistance pursuant to the program established by this act; [and] b.    promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) necessary to implement the provisions of this act; and c.     provide current and former members of the National Guard who were the victims of sexual assault or sexual harassment while members of the National Guard and who are involved in administrative or New Jersey Code of Military Justice proceedings related to the sexual assault or sexual harassment with financial assistance to fully cover the expenses of traveling to and from and participating in those proceedings. (cf: P.L.1993, c.281, s.2) 10.  (New section)  (Supplementing P.L.1991, c.261; C.2C:25-17 et seq.) a. A person entitled to protection under an order of protection issued by the court of another state, tribe, United States territory, military tribunal, or military protective order issued by an appropriate military authority may file a certified copy of the order of protection with the clerk of the Superior Court pursuant to the Rules of Court in a judicial vicinage in which the person believes that enforcement may be necessary. b.    The New Jersey National Guard shall file a certified copy of any military order of protection with the clerk of the Superior Court pursuant to the Rules of Court in a judicial vicinage in which the person entitled to protection resides or if the person entitled to protection is not a State resident, in a judicial vicinage in which it is believed that enforcement may be necessary. c.     The clerk shall: (1)  treat the order of protection in the same manner as a judgment of the Superior Court in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act (2A:49A-25), except that the clerk shall not mail notice of the filing of the order to the respondent named in the order; and (2)  on the same day that an order of protection is filed, file a certified copy of that order with the sheriff or other law enforcement officials charged with maintaining New Jersey State Police records. d.    Neither residence in this State nor filing of an order of protection shall be required for enforcement of the order by this State. Failure to file the order shall not be an impediment to its treatment in all respects as a New Jersey protective order. e.     The clerk shall not charge a fee to file an order of protection under this section. 11.  (New section) (Supplementing chapter 154 of Title 2A of the New Jersey Statutes) Full-time civilian law enforcement officers employed by the Defense Criminal Investigative Service, Army Criminal Investigation Division, Naval Criminal Investigative Service, or Air Force Office of Special Investigations who are empowered to effect an arrest with or without a warrant for violations of the United States Code and who are authorized to carry firearms in the performance of their duties shall be empowered to act as an officer for the arrest of offenders against the laws of this State: a.  when the person reasonably believes that a crime of the first, second, or third degree is or is about to be committed or attempted in the officers  presence; and b. when the person reasonably believes that a crime of the fourth degree relating to criminal sexual contact, harassment, or stalking is or is about to be committed or attempted in the officers presence on a military installation, or off a military installation by a service member against another person, regardless of whether or not either person was on or off duty at the time of the alleged assault, while that officer is in the performance of  official duties. 12.  (New section) (Supplementing chapter 10 of Title 38A of the New Jersey Statutes) Any person subject the provisions of chapter 10 of Title 38A of the New Jersey Statutes who commits an offense prohibited under N.J.S. 2C:33-4 shall be found guilty of that offense by a military court in accordance with chapter 10 of Title 38A of the New Jersey Statutes.  Any person found guilty of an offense prohibited under N.J.S. 2C:33-4 shall be punished as a court-martial may direct. 13.  (New section) (Supplementing P.L.1971, c. 317; C.52:4B-3.5) a. An application submitted to the Victims of Crime Compensation Office for a claim by a military personnel victim based on a sexual assault by another military personnel shall not be denied solely because it was not reported to a superior officer or law enforcement officer at the time of the crime. b.  Factors that the office shall consider for purposes of determining if a claim qualifies for compensation include, but are not limited to,  evidence of the following: (1)   restricted or unrestricted reports to a military victim advocate, sexual assault response coordinator, chaplain, attorney, or other military personnel. (2)  medical or physical evidence consistent with sexual assault. (3)  a  written or oral report from military law enforcement or a civilian law enforcement agency concluding that a sexual assault crime was committed against the victim. (4)  a letter or other written statement from a sexual assault counselor, licensed therapist, or mental health counselor, stating that the victim is seeking services related to the allegation of sexual assault. (5)  a credible witness to whom the victim disclosed the details that a sexual assault crime occurred. (6)  a restraining order from a military or civilian court against the perpetrator of the sexual assault. (7)  other behavior by the victim consistent with sexual assault. c.  For purposes of this section, the sexual assault at issue shall have occurred during military service including deployment. d.  For purposes of this section, the sexual assault may have been committed off base. e.  For purposes of this section, a perpetrator means an individual who is any of the following at the time of the sexual assault: (1)  an active duty military personnel from the United States Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force, Space Force, or Coast Guard. (2)  a civilian employee of any military branch specified in paragraph (1), military base or installation, or military deployment. (3)  a contractor or agent of a private military or private security company. (4)  a member of the New Jersey National Guard. 14.  (New section) (Supplementing P.L.1971, c.437; C.9:6-8.8.10g.) a.  If a report is accepted as a credible allegation of domestic abuse or child abuse or neglect as defined by the Department of Children and Families, the department shall collect information concerning the military status of the spouse, intimate partner, parent, or guardian of the child who is the subject of the report and shall share information about the allegation with the appropriate military authorities in accordance with the memorandum or understanding described in this section. b.  The department shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the military family advocacy program at a local military installation with respect to interpersonal violence and child abuse and neglect investigations. c.  For the purposes of this section, military family advocacy program means the program established by the United States Department of Defense to address child abuse and neglect in military families. d.  Such memorandum of understanding shall establish procedures and protocols for matters including, but not limited to: (1) identifying an individual credibly alleged to have committed abuse or neglect as military personnel; (2) identifying appropriate circumstances for reporting to the military family advocacy program without reducing likelihood of reporting or creating undue risk to the health or wellbeing of the spouse, intimate partner, parent, guardian, or child; (3) reporting to a military family advocacy program when an investigation implicating military personnel has been initiated; and 4) maintaining confidentiality requirements under State and federal law. 15.  (New section) (Supplementing chapter 10 of the Title 38A of the New Jersey Statutes) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the State may exercise concurrent jurisdiction with the United States over a military installation of the United States Department of Defense located within the State in any matter relating to a violation of federal law or the Uniform Code of Military Justice, if all the following criteria are met: (1)  the United States waives exclusive jurisdiction; (2)  the case or allegation pertains to sexual assault; and (3)  the violation of federal law is also a crime or offense under Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes. The Sexual Assault Response Coordinator of the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs may enter into a memorandum of understanding with the appropriate military authorities to effectuate the purposes of this subsection. 16.  (New section) (Supplementing chapter 30 of Title 52 of the Revised Statues) a.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, upon acceptance by the Governor or any other State official department or agency of relinquishment by the United States, the State shall exercise concurrent jurisdiction with the United States over a military installation of the United States within the State on and over land or lands ceded in any matter related to a violation of federal or State law involving  any child or juvenile, within the limits and extent of those lands. b.  The State of New Jersey shall retain concurrent jurisdiction over a military installation of the United States in all civil, juvenile, and domestic relations processes in all cases, and such criminal, juvenile, and domestic relations or other processes as may issue under the laws or authority of the State of New Jersey against any person may be executed therein in the same way and manner as if the consent had not been given or jurisdiction ceded. The provisions of this section shall apply to the relinquishment of jurisdiction acquired by the United States under the provisions of any cessions enacted for a military purpose of the United States. 17.  This act shall take effect immediately but shall be inoperative until the first day of the fourth month next following enactment, except the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs, Department of Children and Families, and the Department of Law and Public Safety may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act. STATEMENT Sexual assault remains a persistent problem in the military despite numerous initiatives to address it. The lack of progress stems from the complexity of the problem of sexual assaults, and it is necessary to develop effective prevention and response programs to increase the reporting of sexual assaults as well as to increase the conviction rates of perpetrators of sexual assault. This bill directs a State court to issue a temporary protective order, in the case of nonconsensual sexual conduct or domestic violence, upon complaint of an applicant who is a service member of the New Jersey National Guard or any Reserve Component of the Armed Forces of the United States serving within the State who is a victim of non-consensual sexual contact who has also received a military protective order, or upon complaint of the Staff Judge Advocate of the New Jersey National Guard or any Reserve Component serving in the State on behalf of a named victim who is a victim of non-consensual sexual contact who has also received a military protective order. The bill makes military protective orders issued by an appropriate military authority effective throughout the State, provides for their enforcement, and        directs the Administrative Office of the Courts to establish and maintain a central registry of all orders of protection issued by an appropriate military authority or a foreign tribunal and all persons who have been charged with a violation of a protective order. The bill makes it a petty disorderly persons offense if, with the purpose to harass another, a person engages in conduct after having been notified, while the person was a member of the National Guard, not to engage in such conduct by a commanding officer. In addition, the bill prohibits any person from obtaining a handgun purchase permit or firearms purchaser identification card who is subject to a restraining order issued pursuant to Prevention of Domestic Violence Act of 1991, a temporary or final domestic violence restraining order issued in another jurisdiction, or a substantially similar order issued by the court of another state, tribe, United States Territory, appropriate military authority, or military tribunal. Under the bill, a person, or the family member of the person, that is participating in a military legal proceeding is to receive unpaid leave from employment to seek legal assistance and remedies and attend and prepare for the proceeding when the proceeding involves domestic or sexual violence. The bill also directs the Adjutant General to provide current and former members of the National Guard who were the victims of sexual assault or sexual harassment while members of the National Guard and who are involved in administrative or New Jersey Code of Military Justice proceedings related to sexual assault or sexual harassment, with financial assistance to fully cover the expenses of traveling to and from and participating in those proceedings. The bill stipulates that a person with an order of protection issued by the court of another state, tribe, United States territory, military tribunal, or military protective order issued by an appropriate military authority to file the order with the clerk of the Superior Court in a judicial vicinage in which the person believes that enforcement may be necessary, and requires the New Jersey National Guard to file a certified copy of any military order of protection with the court in a judicial vicinage in which the person entitled to protection resides or, if the person entitled to protection is not a State resident, in a judicial circuit in which it is believed that enforcement may be necessary. Full-time civilian law enforcement officers employed by the Defense Criminal Investigative Service, Army Criminal Investigation Division, Naval Criminal Investigative Service, or Air Force Office of Special Investigations, who are empowered to effect an arrest with or without a warrant for violations of the United States Code and who are authorized to carry firearms in the performance of their duties are authorized under the bill to act as an officer for the arrest of offenders against the laws of this State where the person reasonably believes that a crime of the first, second, or third degree is or is about to be committed or attempted in his presence, and where the person reasonably believes that a crime of the fourth degree, relating to criminal sexual contact, harassment, or stalking is or is about to be committed or attempted in his presence on a military installation, or off a military installation by a service member against another person, regardless of whether or not either person was on or off duty at the time of the alleged assault, while that officer is in the performance of official duties. The bill provides that a person subject to military discipline under State law who commits an offense of harassment prohibited under State law will be guilty of that offense in accordance with military discipline and be punished as a court martial may direct. Pursuant to the bill, an application for a claim to the Victims of Crime Compensation Office by a military personnel victim based on a sexual assault by another military personnel will not be denied solely because it was not reported to a superior officer or law enforcement officer at the time of the crime and sets forth factors that will be considered for purposes of determining if a claim of military sexual assault qualifies for compensation. The bill provides that if a report is accepted as a credible allegation of domestic abuse or child abuse or neglect by the Department of Children and Families, the department will collect information concerning the military status of the spouse, intimate partner, parent, or guardian of the child who is the subject of the report and share information about the allegation with the appropriate military authorities in accordance with the memorandum of understanding with the military family advocacy program at a local military installation, with respect to interpersonal violence and child abuse and neglect investigations. The State may, pursuant to the bill, exercise concurrent jurisdiction with the United States over a military installation of the United States Department of Defense located within the State in a matter relating to a violation of federal law or the Uniform Code of Military Justice if certain conditions are met. Lastly, the bill provides that, upon acceptance or relinquishment of the United States by the Governor or any other State official, department, or agency, the State will exercise concurrent jurisdiction with the United States over a military installation of the United States within the State in and over land or lands ceded, in a matter related to a violation of federal or State law, upon any child or juvenile, within the limits and extent of lands so ceded and providing that the State will retain concurrent jurisdiction over a military installation of the United States in certain cases.